src/fst/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
!! # subjunctions

LEXICON cs
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adds the tag **+CS**
+CS: # ;

LEXICON Subjunctions
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for at, te, so, ka, ...
at cs "että" ;
te cs "että" ;
so cs "som" ; ! ???
ka cs "kun" ;
ajadissi cs "kunnes" ;
om cs "jos" ;
ke cs "jos" ;
vaȟka cs "vaikka" ;
jakkes% sar cs "niin kuin" ;
it% sar cs "yhtä kuin" ; ! xxx cc?
